Maine, session 132, LD1235.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §203-D is enacted to read:
§203-D. Reporting on funds received by direct share subdivisions pursuant to court
settlements of opioid crisis litigation
A direct share subdivision that receives funds pursuant to the court settlements of the
opioid crisis litigation, as set forth in the Memoranda of Understanding, shall submit a
report to the Attorney General by January 15, 2026, and annually thereafter, detailing the
amount of such funds received and expended in the prior calendar year, including a
description of each such expenditure.
As used in this section, "Memoranda of Understanding" has the same meaning as in
section 203-C, subsection 1, paragraph C and "direct share subdivision" means a
municipality or county that is a plaintiff subdivision identified in Exhibit 3 of the
Memoranda of Understanding.